Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4104
Insurance arrangement, defined.

Insurance arrangement shall mean any plan, program, contract, or combination thereof, or other arrangement under which one or more employers, unions, or other organizations provide to their employees or members, either directly or indirectly through a trust, third-party administrator, or group health insurance plan with an insurer, or any combination thereof, health care services or benefits.

Laws 1984, LB 902, § 4.